CIK: 1180145
Company Name: CARDIOVASCULAR SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2018-08-23
Accession Number: 0001180145-18-000044


Item 1 Business. Special Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements This Form 10 K contains plans, intentions, objectives, estimates and expectations that constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Exchange Act, which are subject to the safe harbor created by those sections. Forward looking statements are based on our management beliefs and assumptions and on information currently available to our management. In some cases, you can identify forward looking statements by terms such as may, will, intend, should, could, would, expect, plans, anticipates, believes, estimates, projects, predicts, potential and similar expressions intended to identify forward looking statements. Examples of these statements include, but are not limited to, any statements regarding our future financial performance, results of operations or sufficiency of capital resources to fund our operating requirements, and other statements that are other than statements of historical fact. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in these forward looking statements due to a number of factors, including the risks and uncertainties that are described more fully by us in , Item 1A and I, Item 7 of this Form 10 K and in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You should not place undue reliance on these forward looking statements, which apply only as of the date of this Form 10 K. You should read this Form 10 K completely and with the understanding that our actual future results may be materially different from what we expect. Except as required by law, we assume no obligation to update these forward looking statements publicly, or to update the reasons actual results could differ materially from those anticipated in these forward looking statements, even if new information becomes available in the future. Corporate Information Cardiovascular Systems, Inc. ( CSI ) was incorporated in Delaware in 2000. Our principal executive office is located at 1225 Old Highway 8 Northwest, St. Paul, Minnesota 55112 Our teleph1 number is (651) 259 1600, and our website is www.csi360.com . The information contained in or accessible through our website is not incorporated by reference into, and should not be considered part of, this Form 10 K. We have received 22 federal registrations in the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office ( USPTO ) of certain marks, including CSI (a first and second), CSI (Stylized) (a first and second), CSIQ , CSIQ (Stylized) , DIAMONDBACK , DIAMONDBACK 360 (a first and second), DIAMONDBACK 360 (Stylized) , GLIDEASSIST , STAY A STEP AHEAD OF PAD , STEALTH 360 , TAKE A STAND AGAINST AMPUTATION , TAKE A STAND AGAINST AMPUTATION (Stylized), VIPERWIRE , VIPERWIRE ADVANCE , VIPERWIRE ADVANCE (Stylized) , VIPERSLIDE , VIPERSLIDE (Stylized) , VIPERTRACK and VIPERTRACK (Stylized) . We have applied for federal trademark registration with the USPTO of certain marks, including VIPERCATH , ZILIENT , and ZILIENT (Stylized) . All other trademarks, trade names and service marks appearing in this Form 10 K are the property of their respective owners. Business Overview We are a medical technology company leading the way in the effort to successfully treat patients suffering from peripheral and coronary artery diseases, including those with arterial calcium, the most difficult form of arterial disease to treat. We are committed to clinical rigor, constant innovation and a defining drive to set the industry standard to deliver safe and effective medical devices that improve the lives of patients facing this difficult disease state. We have developed a patented orbital atherectomy systems ( OAS ) for both peripheral and coronary commercial applications. The primary base of our business is catheter based platforms capable of treating a broad range of vessel sizes and plaque types, including calcified plaque, and address many of the limitations associated with other treatment alternatives. To date, over 392,000 of our OAS devices have been sold to leading institutions across the United States and Japan. Peripheral Our peripheral arterial disease ( PAD ) products are catheter based platforms capable of treating a broad range of plaque types in leg arteries both above and below the knee, including calcified plaque, and address many of the limitations associated with other existing surgical, catheter and pharmacological treatment alternatives. The micro invasive devices use small access sheaths that can provide procedural benefits and allow physicians to treat PAD patients in even the small and tortuous vessels located below the knee and facilitate access through alternative sites in the ankle, foot and wrist, as well as in the groin. 1 The United States Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) granted 510(k) clearance for the following PAD products as a therapy in patients with PAD. We refer to these products in this Form 10 K as the Peripheral OAS. FDA 510(k) Clearance Granted Product Commercial Introduction August 2007 Diamondback 360 Peripheral (1) September 2007 March 2009 Predator 360 (1) April 2009 March 2011 Stealth 360 Peripheral OAS ( Stealth 360 ) March 2011 February 2014 Diamondback 360 60cm Peripheral April 2014 April 2015 Diamondback 360 Low Profile Peripheral July 2015 October 2015 Diamondback 360 150 Peripheral January 2016 October 2015 Diamondback 360 200 Peripheral January 2016 June 2017 Diamondback 360 200cm Peripheral February 2018 June 2017 Diamondback 360 180cm Peripheral February 2018 (1) We are not currently marketing this product. Sales of Peripheral OAS during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2018 represented 68% of revenue. In January 2018, we announced that we entered into an original equipment manufacturer agreement with Integer Holdings Corporation to manufacture our ZILIENT guidewires. The full U.S. market launch of the ZILIENT peripheral guidewires began in early fiscal 2019. We anticipate that additional ZILIENT guidewires for coronary interventions and radial peripheral interventions will become available in the future. In February 2018, we announced that the first patients were treated using our FDA cleared extended length Diamondback 360 Peripheral OAS to treat PAD. The extended length makes it easier for physicians to reach and treat lower limb PAD lesions through the radial artery in the wrist, providing an alternative access point and more options to treat complicated and at risk patients. We are currently in a limited market release with an anticipated full commercial launch in fiscal 2019. Coronary Our coronary arterial disease ( CAD ) product, the Diamondback 360 Coronary OAS ( Coronary OAS ), is a catheter based platform designed to facilitate stent delivery in patients with CAD who are acceptable candidates for percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty or stenting due to de novo , severely calcified coronary artery lesions. The Coronary OAS design is similar to technology used in our Peripheral OAS, customized specifically for the coronary application. In October 2013, we received premarket approval ( PMA ) from the FDA to market the Coronary OAS as a treatment for severely calcified coronary arteries and we commenced a commercial launch that same month. Sales of Coronary OAS during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2018 represented approximately 23% of revenue. In January 2018, we announced our relationship with OrbusNeich to be the exclusive U.S. distributor of OrbusNeich balloon products. In March 2018, the FDA granted 510(k) clearance for the OrbusNeich 10mm Sapphire II Pro coronary balloon ( 10mm balloon ). The 10mm balloon, the first and only 10mm coronary balloon available in the United States, offers industry leading entry and crossing profiles and is precision engineered for crossing and treating extremely tight and complex lesions. We anticipate OrbusNeich full coronary balloon product portfolio will become available in the United States during fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2020. In addition to the Peripheral and Coronary OAS, we offer multiple accessory products required for use with the Peripheral and Coronary OAS. Sales of accessory products, primarily guide wires, represented 9% of revenue during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2018 . International In November 2016, we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Medikit Co., Ltd. to sell our Coronary and Peripheral OAS in Japan. In March 2017, we received approval from Japan Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare ( MHLW ) for our Coronary OAS Micro Crown. In February 2018, the Coronary OAS Micro Crown received reimbursement approval in Japan, followed by the first commercial sales in Japan. This represents the first international market for any of our products, and most 2 importantly, an opportunity to provide physicians in Japan a cost effective treatment option for the difficult to treat patient population with severely calcified coronary lesions. In October 2014, we received CE Mark for our Stealth 360 device. In July 2018, we entered into an exclusive Distribution Agreement with OrbusNeich to sell our Peripheral and Coronary OAS outside of the United States and Japan. We expect that OrbusNeich will commence sales of our products in certain countries in Southeast Asia, Europe and the Middle East during fiscal year 2019. Market Overview Peripheral Artery Disease ( PAD ) Peripheral artery disease is widespread and can be life threatening. The disease is characterized by narrowed, hardened arteries in the legs, limiting blood flow to the legs and feet. If left untreated, PAD may continue to progress to Critical Limb Ischemia ( CLI ), a condition in which the amount of oxygenated blood being delivered to the limb is insufficient to keep the tissue viable. CLI may lead to non healing ulcers, infections, gangrene, limb amputation or death. According to estimates by the American Heart Association ( AHA ), as many as 18 million Americans, mostly over the age of 65, have PAD. An aging population, coupled with high rates of diabetes and obesity, is likely to continue to increase the prevalence of PAD. In many older PAD patients, particularly those with diabetes, PAD is characterized by fibrotic (moderately hard) or calcified (extremely hard) plaque deposits that can be very challenging to treat. Although we believe the rate of PAD diagnoses is increasing, we also believe that under diagnosis continues, due to patient and physician awareness. Emphasis on PAD education from industry, medical associations, insurance companies and other groups, coupled with publications in medical journals and public news channels, is increasing physician and patient awareness of PAD risk factors, symptoms, and treatment options. Physicians manage a significant portion of the PAD diagnosed population by recommending lifestyle changes, such as diet and exercise, and by prescribing prescription drugs, such as statins. While medications, diet and exercise may improve blood flow, they do not treat the underlying vascular occlusions, and many patients have difficulty maintaining lifestyle changes. As a result of these challenges, many medically managed patients develop more severe symptoms that require procedural intervention. Coronary Artery Disease ( CAD ) Heart disease is the leading cause of death in both men and women in the United States. Coronary artery disease is the most common type of heart disease in the United States and is a life threatening condition. CAD occurs when a fatty material called plaque builds up on the walls of arteries that supply blood to the heart. The plaque buildup causes the arteries to harden and narrow (atherosclerosis), reducing blood flow. The risk of CAD increases if a person has 1 or more of the following high blood pressure, abnormal cholesterol levels, diabetes, or family history of early heart disease. According to the AHA, 16.3 million people in the United States (or 6.3% of the adult population) have CAD, the most common form of heart disease. According to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, over 370,000 lives are claimed in the United States each year from CAD. According to estimates, significant arterial calcium is present in nearly 40% of patients (Genereux et al., 2014; Bourantas et al., 2014), and severe calcium affects up to 20% of patients (Bourantas et al., 2014), undergoing a percutaneous coronary intervention ( PCI ). Significant calcium contributes to poor outcomes and higher treatment costs in coronary interventions when traditional therapies are used, including a significantly higher occurrence of death and major adverse cardiac events. Our Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS Our orbital atherectomy systems represent a unique and innovative approach to the treatment of PAD and CAD that provide physicians and patients with a procedure that addresses many of the limitations of other treatment alternatives. The Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS devices are single use catheters that incorporate a control handle and flexible drive shaft with an eccentrically mounted diamond coated crown. The peripheral device is often used for vessel preparation to enable low pressure percutaneous transluminal angioplasty, including the use of drug coated balloons ( DCB ), and results in lower use of bailout stents. The coronary device is similarly used to prepare a vessel by treating severe calcium prior to stent delivery to help facilitate vessel access and stent expansion and prevent malapposition of stent struts for optimal stent performance. The OAS treats atherosclerotic plaque, which is harder than a normal vessel wall. The OAS is designed to differentiate between hard, diseased plaque and healthy, compliant arterial tissue, a concept that we refer to as differential sanding. The diamond coated crown preferentially engages and sands away harder material, but is designed not to damage more compliant parts of the artery, which flex away from the crown. Physicians position the crown at the site of a lesion containing arterial plaque and orbit the crown against it to sand away the superficial, or surface, plaque and create a smooth lumen, or channel, in the vessel. In addition, the crown rotating eccentric mass and orbital motion deliver pulsatile mechanical energy into the vessel wall. These 3 pulsatile forces may break up deeper plaque and contribute to improving the compliance change of the diseased segment of the artery. Comp1nts of the OAS Our OAS uses a single use, low profile catheter that travels over our proprietary ViperWire guide wires and is electrically powered by a small, portable saline infusion pump that also helps cool the system and remove debris. The Peripheral OAS reduces plaque on peripheral vessel walls by using an orbiting, diamond coated crown within peripheral arteries. Similarly, the Coronary OAS uses the same method to reduce severely calcified plaque on coronary vessel walls within coronary arteries in order to facilitate stent performance. Catheter. The catheter for our OAS consists of an electrically powered control handle, which allows movement of the crown and predictable crown location; a flexible drive shaft with an eccentrically mounted diamond coated crown, which tracks and orbits over the guide wire; and a sheath, which covers the drive shaft and permits delivery of saline or medications to the treatment area. ViperWire Advance Peripheral Guide Wire, ViperWire Advance Peripheral Guide Wire with Flex Tip and ViperWire Advance Coronary Guide Wire. The ViperWire guide wires are required for using the OAS and were designed to offer the ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions. The OAS travels over this wire to the lesion and operates on this wire. ViperSlide Lubricant. ViperSlide is an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the OAS. Saline Infusion Pump. The saline infusion pump is a small, portable device that bathes the OAS shaft and crown and provides an electric power supply for the operation of the catheter. The constant flow of saline during orbit reduces the risk of heat generation and improves the flush of particulates. Mechanism of Action The mechanism of action is a function of the centrifugal force generated by the eccentrically mounted crown as it rotates and orbits inside the vessel. As the speed of the crown rotation increases, centrifugal force increases the crown radius of orbit and presses the diamond coated crown against the lesion or plaque, removing a small amount of plaque with each orbit. The centrifugal force exerted onto the vessel wall decreases as the orbital radius increases, reducing the likelihood of adverse events during treatment. The characteristics of the orbit and the resulting lumen size can be adjusted by modifying the following 2 variables Speed. An increase in speed creates a larger orbital radius, thus accommodating larger diameter vessels. Our Peripheral OAS allows the user to choose between 3 rotational speeds. Our Coronary OAS Classic Crown allows the user to choose between 2 rotational speeds, in addition to engaging a recently added Glide Assist feature, which is an innovative solution that facilitates device tracking, provides easier device repositioning, and provides enhanced performance in challenging anatomies. Crown Characteristics. The crowns for the OAS are designed with various weights (as determined by crown geometry and material density) and are coated with diamond particles. The Peripheral OAS crowns are available in 3 configurations classic, micro and solid. Physicians select crown sizes and configurations based on several case criteria, including reference vessel size, lesion length and degree of stenosis, stenosis morphology, and anatomy tortuosity. The crown for the Coronary OAS is available in 2 configurations 125 millimeter Classic Crown (currently sold in the United States), and the 125 millimeter Micro Crown (currently sold in Japan). Centrifugal force propels the crown outward against the arterial wall as the crown rotates. This force is offset by the counterforce exerted by the arterial wall and the guidewire. Normal arteries are compliant and have the ability to expand and contract as needed to supply blood flow. If the tissue is compliant, it flexes away, minimizing the engagement of the diamond grit and protecting the integrity of the healthy tissue. Diseased tissue is less flexible or non compliant and provides resistance to the centrifugal force, which generates an opposing force that enables the diamond coated crown to engage and sand the plaque. The sanded plaque and calcium are broken down into particles generally smaller than circulating red blood cells that are washed away downstream with the patient natural blood flow. 4 The small particle size and short treatment time minimizes the risk of vascular bed overload, or a saturation of the peripheral or coronary vessels with large particles, which may cause slow or reduced blood flow. The small size of the particles allows them to be naturally cleared from the blood via various types of white blood cells and macrophages. We believe the OAS offers the following key benefits Strong Safety Profile Differential Sanding Reduces Risk of Adverse Events . The OAS is designed to differentiate between hard, non compliant plaque and soft, compliant arterial tissue. Arteries are composed of 3 tissue layers (from inside to out) the intima, media, and adventitia. The eccentrically mounted diamond coated crown at the working end of the device engages and removes plaque from the artery wall with minimal likelihood of penetrating or damaging the fragile intima, or inner layer of the arterial wall because soft, compliant tissue flexes away from the crown. Eliminates Need for Distal Protection. The small size of the particles produced during sanding avoids the need for ancillary distal protection devices, commonly used with directional cutting atherectomy devices. The small particulate size also significantly reduces the risk of macroembolization, or larger pieces of removed plaque capable of blocking blood flow downstream. Allows Continuous Blood Flow During Procedure. The OAS allows for continuous blood flow while orbiting, as well as constant flushing of particulates during treatment. Other devices may restrict blood flow due to the size of the catheter required or the use of distal protection devices, which could result in complications such as excessive heat and tissue damage. Benefits of Smaller Sheaths. The Diamondback 360 Peripheral OAS portfolio is uniquely compatible with 4 French ( Fr ) to 6Fr sheaths. Centrifugal force enables the OAS to treat large vessels through small sheaths; for example, it can treat up to 5mm vessel through a 4Fr sheath. Smaller sheaths may be associated with fewer bleeding complications, shortened post procedure ambulation time and reduced radiation exposure. Proven Efficacy Efficacy Demonstrated for Both Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS. Peripheral OAS Our pivotal OASIS clinical trial was designed to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the OAS in treating patients with symptomatic PAD. Performance targets were established cooperatively with the FDA before the trial began. Despite 55% of the lesions consisting of calcified plaque, the Diamondback 360 Peripheral OAS successfully met the study endpoints. Coronary OAS Our pivotal ORBIT II Coronary OAS trial was designed to evaluate the safety and efficacy of the OAS in treating de novo severely calcified coronary lesions. The trial met both the primary safety and efficacy endpoints by significant margins. Preparation of severely calcified plaque with the Coronary OAS not only helped facilitate stent delivery, but also improved both peri procedural and 30 day clinical outcomes compared with the outcomes of historic control subjects in this difficult to treat patient population. Treats Difficult, Fibrotic and Calcified Lesions. The Peripheral OAS enables physicians to remove plaque from long, fibrotic, or calcified lesions, as well as bifurcated lesions or lesions with softer plaque, in peripheral arteries both above and below the knee. In the coronary arteries, the Coronary OAS enables physicians to treat complex, severely calcified lesions, enabling stent placement in these difficult to treat lesions. To date, the Coronary OAS is the only FDA approved device approved specifically for treatment of severely calcified coronary lesions. Orbital Motion Improves Lesion Compliance. The orbiting action of the OAS removes the hard plaque in the artery by sanding, while the centrifugal motion of the eccentrically mounted crown creates pulsatile forces. Compliance change is achieved as the OAS differentiates between hard, diseased plaque and healthy, compliant arterial tissue, a concept that we refer to as differential sanding. The diamond coated crown preferentially engages and sands away harder material, but is designed to not damage more compliant healthy parts of the artery, which flex away from the crown. Physicians position the crown at the site of a lesion containing arterial plaque and orbit the crown against it to sand away the superficial, or surface, plaque and create a smooth lumen, or channel, in the vessel. In addition, the crown rotating eccentric mass and orbital motion deliver pulsatile mechanical energy into the vessel wall. These pulsatile forces may break up deeper plaque and contribute to compliance change of the diseased segment of the artery. 5 Together, these mechanistic comp1nts sufficiently remove or modify hard plaque, allowing for low pressure balloon inflation. The orbital motion and speed of the eccentrically mounted crown increases, thus allowing for continuous reduction of plaque with differential sanding and pulsatile forces, as the opening of the lumen increases during the operation of the devices. Differential Sanding Creates Smooth Lumens. The differential sanding of the OAS creates a smooth lumen surface, or channel, inside the vessel. We believe that the smooth lumens created by the device increase the velocity of blood flow and decrease the resistance to blood flow, which may decrease the potential for restenosis, or re narrowing of the arteries. Ease of Use Set Up Time. Given the relative simplicity of the OAS, physicians and lab staff can usually set up and begin using the device in under 2 minutes. Utilizes Familiar Techniques. Physicians using the OAS employ techniques similar to those used in angioplasty, which are familiar to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists who are trained in endovascular techniques. The devices simple user interfaces require minimal additional training. Single Crown Treats Multiple Lesions in Various Sized Vessels. Centrifugal force unique to the OAS allows for a single access site to treat multiple lesions, in most cases. In the coronary arteries, Coronary OAS is the only atherectomy device able to treat 25 to 4mm vessels with 1 device through a 6Fr radial approach. In the peripheral vasculature, the OAS is capable of treating multiple lesions in multiple arteries through a single access site, thus reducing the need for multiple devices or the need for multiple access sites. No Need for Collection Reservoir. Because the particles of plaque sanded away are of such small sizes, the OAS does not require a collection reservoir that needs to be repeatedly emptied or cleaned during the procedure, which would potentially add time and cost to the procedure. Multiple Applications The unique OAS mechanism of action used in both the Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS can be used to treat multiple anatomic locations. Below the Knee and Behind the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries below and behind the knee are small in diameter and may be diffusely stenosed, calcified or both. Reaching and treating these small vessels requires a low profile, which most competitive devices do not offer. Behind the knee, or popliteal, lesions also present challenges if a stent is used because stents frequently fracture in this area due to the forces exerted on the vessels when the knee bends or flexes. The Diamondback 360 Peripheral OAS is effective in treating those vessels. The Peripheral OAS offers a shorter shaft length (60cm), a smaller profile and a more flexible shaft than the predecessors for improved ease of use, and includes a 4 Fr catheter that enables physicians to access lesions below the knee using retrograde access through arteries in the ankle or foot. Above the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries above the knee are typically longer, straighter and wider than below the knee vessels. Plaque in these arteries may also be diffuse, fibrotic and calcific. Physicians often use higher speeds or larger crown sizes of our products to treat lesions above the knee. Our newest Peripheral OAS innovation includes the addition of extended length OAS that can treat above the knee disease through trans radial access (access through the radial artery in the wrist). The ability to treat the larger above the knee arteries with OAS via the small trans radial access sites is made possible by the unique features of the OAS including its small crossing profile and ability to orbit at higher speeds for treatment of larger vessels. Coronary Artery Disease. The individuals more at risk for being diagnosed with CAD are those that are suffering from high blood pressure, abnormal cholesterol levels, diabetes, renal insufficiency, or have a family history of heart disease. The pathogenesis of CAD is marked by the accumulation of a fatty material called plaque on the walls of arteries that supply blood to the heart. The plaque buildup causes the arteries to harden and narrow (atherosclerosis), reducing blood flow. The Coronary OAS is the only atherectomy device specifically indicated for severe coronary calcium. 6 Cost and Time Efficient Procedure Short Procedure Time. The OAS has a short treatment time, typically less than 2 minutes. Single Crown Can Treat Various Lumen Sizes Helping Limit Hospital Costs. The OAS orbital mechanism of action allows 1 device to treat various diameter lumens inside the artery. Adjusting the rotational speed of the crown changes the orbit to create the desired lumen diameter, thereby potentially avoiding the need to use multiple catheters of different sizes to treat multiple lesions. Trans Radial Access Provides Multiple Benefits. The low profile of the OAS allows for trans radial access with benefits to both physicians and patients. Radial access can enable treatment of complex, calcified coronary and, often, peripheral arteries that are challenging to access. In addition, the radial access site is associated with lower vascular and bleeding complication rates, faster patient recovery time, and the ability to treat bilateral disease in 1 setting, address obese patients and work around previous, compromised access sites. For patients, this contributes to comfort during and post operation, earlier ambulation, reduced risk of infection, and faster healing. Retrograde Access Treatment Option Benefits. Many of the patients treated with the Peripheral OAS have advanced PAD and suffer from CLI. These patients often have complex, calcified lesions in their lower leg, which are challenging to access and treat using the traditional femoral artery access site. If left untreated, these cases may result in lower limb amputation. Our family of 125mm Peripheral OASs with 4Fr compatibility allows for more options to treat those lesions by providing a low profile system that is fully compatible with alternative access sites in the foot or ankle. Smaller sheaths have been shown to reduce procedure times and decrease complications. Our Strategy Our goal is to be the leading provider of solutions for the treatment of PAD and CAD. We intend to broaden our product offering and expand to new international markets. The key elements of our strategy include Drive Adoption through Our Direct U.S. Sales Organization, Medical Education and Key Opinion Leaders. We expect to continue to drive adoption of the OAS in both hospital and office based lab settings through the strong support of a clinically knowledgeable direct U.S. sales force focused on the needs of interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons, interventional radiologists and their cath lab teams. A key element of our strategy is a focus on educating and training physicians about disease states, our clinical data, and proper use and application of OAS technology through programs delivered via physician faculty, our direct sales force and seminars where physician industry leaders discuss case studies and treatment techniques using the devices. Build a Strong Portfolio of Clinical Evidence on Safety, Effectiveness and Economic Benefits of the OAS. Physicians and payors are increasingly interested in clinical and economic evidence to support decisions regarding optimal treatment of patients. We are focused on conducting robust clinical studies that provide insight into and demonstrate the effectiveness of the OAS in treating complex peripheral and coronary artery disease. We believe that demonstrating the clinical advantages and cost effectiveness of our OAS technology is critical to support physician adoption of the OAS, drive best clinical practice, and sustain ongoing reimbursement coverage for our devices. Enhance OAS and Expand Product Portfolio within the Market for Treatment of Peripheral and Coronary Arteries. In addition to continued innovation and product development on our peripheral and coronary OAS platforms, we are growing our product portfolio to offer new accessories and devices that improve outcomes and expand the patient population we can treat. See Pursue Strategic Acquisitions and Partnerships and Research and Development Activities Development Activities for descriptions of new products in development. Expand Internationally. In November 2016, we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Medikit Co., Ltd. to sell the Diamondback 360 Coronary OAS Micro Crown in Japan. In March 2017, we received approval of that device from Japan MHLW. In February 2018, we announced reimbursement approval and our first commercially treated patient in Japan. This represented our first entry into the international market, and most importantly, an opportunity to provide physicians in Japan with a cost effective treatment option for the difficult to treat patient population with severely calcified coronary lesions. In October 2014, we received CE Mark for our Stealth 360 Peripheral OAS device and we are planning to seek approval of other products in Europe. 7 In July 2018, we entered into an exclusive Distribution Agreement with OrbusNeich to sell our coronary and peripheral OAS outside of the United States and Japan. We expect that OrbusNeich will commence sales of our products in certain countries in Southeast Asia, Europe and the Middle East during our fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, and we will closely collaborate with OrbusNeich on the timing of product introductions in each country under this Distribution Agreement. OrbusNeich and its authorized sub distributors will be responsible for selling our products, and we will focus our international efforts on physician training and education on our products. Pursue Strategic Acquisitions and Partnerships . In addition to adding to our product portfolio through internal development efforts, we are opportunistically seeking ways to expand our portfolio through acquisitions, distribution agreements, licensing transactions, manufacturing agreements and other strategic partnerships to add new product lines and technologies that leverage our sales expertise and footprint or complement our strategic objectives. In January 2018, we announced an exclusive U.S. distribution agreement with OrbusNeich to offer their full line of semi compliant, non compliant and specialty balloons for both coronary and peripheral vascular procedures. Currently we are focused on offering their coronary balloons, including the Sapphire II Pro, which obtained FDA clearance in March 2018 as the first and only 10mm coronary balloon available in the United States. In addition, we entered into an agreement with Integer Holdings Corporation to manufacture our ZILIENT peripheral guidewires, which are designed to provide tip resilience and crossability in challenging peripheral arterial lesions. Finally, we entered into an agreement with Aerolase Corp. for the co development of a new laser atherectomy device for physicians to use in more effectively treating multiple forms of arterial disease. Research and Development Activities Clinical Studies Summary We study the most challenging patient populations and are committed to providing relevant clinical evidence that enables physicians to select and utilize the best treatment options for their patients. A total of 6,121 subjects (4,788 PAD and 1,333 CAD) have been enrolled in our clinical studies as of June 30, 2018. Our clinical studies incorporate rigorous long term clinical and healthcare economic data that are critical to improving patient care and ongoing healthcare changes. We have completed numerous clinical studies to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the Peripheral OAS. Its unique mechanism of action differentiates the Peripheral OAS from other endovascular PAD treatment options and in our clinical studies of patients with the most challenging lesions, the Peripheral OAS consistently demonstrates successful lesion modification and durable results. PAD Studies The following PAD clinical studies were completed or in process during fiscal 2018 LIBERTY 360 . This prospective, observational, multi center clinical study is evaluating the procedural and long term clinical, quality of life and economic outcomes of endovascular device interventions, including orbital atherectomy, for the treatment of PAD. We expect the results from this study to increase our understanding of the clinical and economic outcomes of endovascular treatment for PAD patients, including those with the most advanced form of the disease, Rutherford Class 6. Enrollment of 1,204 subjects at 51 sites in the United States was completed in February 2016. LIBERTY 360 2 year data was presented in August 2018. The majority of devices used in the study were balloons and or atherectomy, and the Peripheral OAS was the most frequently used atherectomy device. The LIBERTY 360 data through 2 years demonstrated that peripheral interventions can be used successfully across all Rutherford classes, including the most challenging Rutherford Class 6 subjects. Quality of life improved significantly from baseline to 2 years in all Rutherford groups. An orbital atherectomy subanalysis of the LIBERTY 360 data indicated high freedom from major amputation at 2 years in all Rutherford Classes (RC2 3, 99.1%; RC4 5, 94.5%; and RC6, 79.8%). Overall, the results of this novel all comers PAD study suggest that peripheral vascular intervention ( PVI ) is an alternative to primary amputation in Rutherford Class 6 patients. Additionally, data from the LIBERTY 360 study provide further evidence to support PVI treatment in Rutherford 2 5 patients. 8 OPTIMIZE BTK. This pilot, hypothesis generating, non powered, multi center, randomized clinical study conducted in Europe is designed to gather preliminary exploratory data regarding the acute and long term clinical outcomes of orbital atherectomy with adjunctive DCB angioplasty versus DCB angioplasty al1 in PAD patients with calcified, below the knee lesions. We completed enrollment of fifty evaluable patients in May 2018, and these patients will be followed for up to 2 years. CAD Studies We have conducted 2 clinical studies to evaluate the safety and efficacy of the Coronary OAS Classic Crown device the ORBIT I feasibility study and the ORBIT II pivotal study. The safety and efficacy of the Coronary OAS Micro Crown device were evaluated in the COAST study. The following CAD clinical study was in process during fiscal 2018 ECLIPSE. This post market, randomized 1 to 1, multi center trial is designed to evaluate vessel preparation with Coronary OAS Classic Crown compared to conventional angioplasty technique prior to drug eluting stent implantation for the treatment of severely calcified lesions. Approximately 2,000 subjects will be enrolled at approximately 150 sites in the United States and subjects will be followed for up to 2 years. The co primary endpoints of acute minimum stent area (assessed by optical coherence tomography in a subset of equally randomized 500 subjects) and 1 year target vessel failure are powered to demonstrate superiority of OAS vessel preparation vs. conventional angioplasty. Our clinical portfolio is expanding as we develop future studies to answer difficult questions about PAD and CAD treatment. Our clinical research continues to highlight the safety and efficacy of the OAS and current and new research illustrates our versatility in the emerging vascular market. Development Activities Our product research and development activities are dedicated to the development and commercialization of products that serve the peripheral and coronary vascular disease space, with emphasis towards high margin products and complex arterial disease states treated by our primary customers. The focus and value proposition of our products is to enable positive acute and long term clinical outcomes, with efficiency and predictability, in challenging patient subsets. Research and development resources have been strategically allocated between opportunities that maximize the clinical effectiveness and user satisfaction of our OAS product line and the development of additional products that offer portfolio diversification and incremental revenue opportunities. Specific to the peripheral vascular disease market, we will continue our commitment to patients suffering from CLI through a breadth of above the knee and below the knee differentiated products that treat or uniquely expand the ability of our devices to treat obstructive lesions throughout the leg and foot. Most recently, we launched a line of extended length Diamondback 360 products (180 cm and 200 cm) that are intended to accommodate patient anatomy and physician preferred access methodology, for example radial access. Specific to the coronary vascular disease market, we are building a portfolio of differentiated products that are used to treat complex CAD. We launched a new coronary OAS feature called GlideAssist. This feature is an innovative solution that facilitates device tracking, provides easier device repositioning, and provides enhanced performance in challenging anatomies. We also recently launched our next generation saline infusion pump. The pump is the reusable comp1nt of the system, and the next generation product has been updated to comply with new medical device standards and address numerous user satisfaction opportunities. In addition, we entered into an agreement with Aerolase Corp. for the co development of a new laser atherectomy device for physicians to use to more effectively treat multiple forms of arterial disease, and we are developing a new temporary hemodynamic support pump. Emphasis in both franchises is placed on novel and differentiated devices that address unmet or under met clinical or technical needs. Research and development expenses for the years ended June 30, 2018 , 2017 , and 2016 were $26.8 million , $229 million and $25.9 million , respectively. 9 Sales and Marketing We market and sell the majority of our products through a direct sales force in the United States. Revenues for the years ended June 30, 2018 , 2017 , and 2016 were $217.0 million , $204.9 million and $178.2 million , respectively. We have targeted sales and marketing efforts to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists with experience using similar catheter based procedures, such as angioplasty, stenting, and directional or laser atherectomy. Professional education is also a key element of our sales strategy. We target our marketing efforts to practiti1rs through medical conferences, seminars, peer reviewed journals and marketing materials. Our sales and marketing program focuses on clinical results showing safety and efficacy of our products; educating physicians on the prevalence and complications of calcium in PAD and CAD; and developing relationships with key opinion leaders. We sell the majority of our products through direct shipment to hospitals or clinics. We are party to a purchasing agreement with HealthTrust Purchasing Group, L.P. ( HPG ), which was renewed effective May 1, 2018 and expires on July 31, 2021 HPG acts as a group purchasing organization for the healthcare providers belonging to HPG as participants. Under the purchasing agreement, all of HPG participants located in the United States or its territories are eligible to purchase our orbital atherectomy systems and related products at prices set forth in the purchasing agreement. The purchasing agreement may be terminated at any time, without cause, by HPG upon at least 60 days prior written notice to us. Either party may terminate the purchasing agreement upon the occurrence of a material breach by the other party that goes uncured within 30 days following receipt of written notice of such breach. If the purchasing agreement with HPG were to be terminated, our financial results will be materially adversely affected. Outside of the United States, sales of our products in Japan are through our exclusive distributor, Medikit. In July 2018, we entered into an exclusive distribution agreement with OrbusNeich to sell our Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS outside of the United States and Japan through OrbusNeich current sales and distribution ne2rk. For the year ended June 30, 2018, $18 million of our revenue was from sales in Japan, while the remaining revenues were from sales in the United States. For the years ended June 30, 2017 and 2016, all of our revenues were from sales in the United States. We have observed some degree of seasonality in our business, as there tends to be a lower number of procedures that use our products during the 3 months ending September 30. Interventional procedure volume usually grows throughout the course of the fiscal year, with the quarter ending June 30 usually representing the highest volume of cases and, therefore, the highest amount of revenue generated by us during the course of the fiscal year. Manufacturing We use internally manufactured and externally sourced comp1nts to manufacture the OAS. Most of the externally sourced comp1nts are available from multiple suppliers; however, certain key comp1nts, including the diamond grit coated crown and our ViperSlide Lubricant, are single sourced. We have strategies and arrangements in place for procuring our key comp1nts from alternative suppliers in the event that 1 or more of our single source suppliers were to discontinue supplying us with a key comp1nt. We assemble the shaft, crown and handle comp1nts on site, and test, pack, seal and label the finished assembly before sending the packaged product to a contract sterilization facility. Upon return from the sterilizer, the product is held in inventory prior to shipping to our customers. We are located in a leased 125,000 square foot corporate headquarters in Minnesota. This custom designed building has space for more than 500 employees and contains dedicated research and development, training and education, and manufacturing facilities. Depending on staffing, the facility has the annual capacity to produce in excess of 75,000 devices per shift. The finished goods storage has capacity for approximately 20,000 devices and more than 500 saline infusion pumps, as well as other accessory products. Our leased Pearland, Texas facility is 46,000 square feet and includes a custom built clean room and production space for future expansion of value add processes, including machining and electronics assembly. The facility, when fully staffed and equipped, also has the annual capacity to produce approximately 75,000 devices per shift. This facility has finished goods storage capacity for greater than 15,000 devices and other accessory products and over 500 saline infusion pumps. 10 We believe that our facilities in Minnesota and Texas will provide adequate production, assembly, and warehousing capacity for the foreseeable future. We are registered with the FDA as a medical device manufacturer and comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation ( QSR ). We have opted to maintain a Quality Management System to enable us to market our products in the member states of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association and countries that have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements with the European Union. We are ISO 134852003 certified, and our renewal is due in December 2018. Under these registrations, our plants are audited by the FDA and our Notified Body. The Stealth 360 Peripheral OAS has received CE Mark. We are registered as a Foreign Medical Device Manufacturer in Japan and our registration certificate renewal is due in June 2021 Third Party Reimbursement and Pricing Third party payors, including private insurers and government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, pay for a significant portion of patient care provided in the United States. The single largest payor in the United States is the Medicare program, a federal governmental health insurance program administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services ( CMS ). Medicare covers certain medical care expenses for eligible elderly and disabled individuals, including a large percentage of the population with PAD and CAD who could be treated with the OAS. In addition, private insurers often follow the coverage and reimbursement policies of Medicare. Consequently, Medicare coverage and reimbursement policies are important to our operations. CMS establishes Medicare reimbursement coverage policy and payment rates for physician and facility healthcare services, including procedures using atherectomy products. Obtaining and maintaining coding, coverage and payment for our products is critical for commercial success. We believe that physicians and hospitals that treat PAD and CAD with the respective OAS will generally be eligible to receive reimbursement from Medicare, as well as private insurers, that is adequate to cover the costs of OAS, associated materials, and physician services. With respect to reimbursement outside of the United States, in February 2018, the Coronary OAS Micro Crown received reimbursement approval in Japan, followed by the first commercial sales in Japan. In connection with our Distribution Agreement with OrbusNeich, we and OrbusNeich will seek reimbursement approvals in other countries in connection with the commercial introductions of our products, to the extent that reimbursement is available and subject to local rules and regulations. Competition The medical device industry is highly competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other activities of industry participants. Our OAS compete with a variety of other products or devices for the treatment of vascular disease, including stents, balloon angioplasty catheters and atherectomy catheters, as well as products used in vascular surgery. Competitors in the stent and balloon angioplasty market segments include Abbott Laboratories, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, Johnson & Johnson, Becton Dickinson, and Medtronic. We also compete against manufacturers of atherectomy catheters and other products designed to treat vascular disease, including Medtronic, Philips Spectranetics, Boston Scientific, Ra Medical, Shockwave and Avinger, as well as manufacturers that may enter the market due to the increasing demand for treatment of vascular disease. Other competitors include pharmaceutical companies that manufacture drugs for the treatment of PAD and CAD and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral and coronary bypass procedures. Because of the size of the peripheral opportunities, competitors and potential competitors have historically dedicated significant resources to aggressively promote their products. We believe that our Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS compete primarily on the basis of safety and efficacy, even in calcified plaque (or severely calcified plaque in the coronaries); low profile and alternative access site capabilities; predictable clinical performance; availability of clinical data; ease of use; economic benefit; key opinion leader support and customer base; customer service and support. 11 We are aware of a company, Cardio Flow, Inc., developing an atherectomy system that could potentially compete with our products. On August 27, 2012, we entered into a Settlement Agreement with Lela Nadirashvili, the widow of Dr. Leonid Shturman, our founder, relating to the ownership of certain patents invented by Dr. Shturman. We believe that Ms. Nadirashvili assigned her rights under the Settlement Agreement, including the right to utilize certain patents, to Cardio Flow. On April 6, 2018, we filed a breach of contract action against Cardio Flow in Minnesota District Court in Ramsey County, Minnesota, alleging that Cardio Flow has developed or is in the process of developing an atherectomy device that incorporates elements belonging exclusively to us, in violation of the Settlement Agreement. We are seeking damages and a permanent injunction preventing Cardio Flow from taking further steps to develop or attempt to develop an atherectomy device that incorporates the elements that belong exclusively to us. We are pursuing our claims against Cardio Flow vigorously. Patents and Intellectual Property We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and other intellectual property laws, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. As of June 2018, we held 52 issued U.S. patents and have 38 U.S. patent applications pending, as well as 175 granted foreign patents and 152 foreign patent applications pending, each of which corresponds to aspects of our U.S. patents and applications. Our issued U.S. patents expire between 2019 and 2035, and our patents covering the core technology begin to expire in 2023 while providing core technology coverage through 2035. We have many additional patents relating to our core technology currently pending in the USPTO, which will extend our key covered subject matter and coverage dates significantly. Our issued patents and patent applications relate primarily to the design and operation of interventional atherectomy devices, including the Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS. These patents and applications include claims covering key aspects of orbital atherectomy devices, including the design, manufacture and therapeutic use of certain atherectomy abrasive heads, drive shafts, control systems, handles and couplings. As we continue to research and develop our atherectomy technology, we intend to file additional U.S. and foreign patent applications related to the design, manufacture and therapeutic uses of atherectomy devices. In addition, we hold 22 registered U.S. trademarks, 17 registered marks in the Madrid Protocol with protection granted within at least 1 of Australia, the European Union, China, India, Japan, the United Kingdom, and Mexico, six registered marks in the European Union, 12 registered marks in Canada, eight registered marks in India, four registered marks in Mexico, and nine registered marks in Hong Kong. We have multiple pending trademark applications worldwide. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by requiring our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors to execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. Government Regulation of Medical Devices Governmental authorities in the United States at the federal, state and local levels and in other countries extensively regulate, among other things, the development, testing, manufacture, labeling, promotion, advertising, distribution, marketing and export and import of medical devices such as the Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS. Failure to obtain approval to market our products under development and to meet the ongoing requirements of these regulatory authorities could prevent us from marketing and continuing to market our products. United States The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ) and the FDA implementing regulations govern medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. Medical devices and their manufacturers are also subject to inspection by the FDA. The FDCA, supplemented by other federal and state laws, also provides civil and criminal penalties for violations of its provisions. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will require marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization are premarket notification (also called 510(k) clearance) and PMA. 12 510(k) Clearance. To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device legally marketed in the United States. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. A showing of substantial equivalence sometimes, but not always, requires clinical data. Generally, the 510(k) clearance process can exceed 90 days and may extend to a year or more. After a device has received 510(k) clearance for a specific intended use, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, such as a significant change in the design, materials, method of manufacture or intended use, will require a new 510(k) clearance or PMA (if the device as modified is not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device). The determination as to whether new authorization is needed is initially left to the manufacturer; however, the FDA may review this determination to evaluate the regulatory status of the modified product at any time and may require the manufacturer to cease marketing the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA is obtained. The manufacturer may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. We received 510(k) clearances for the Peripheral OAS as set forth under Business Overview. Premarket Approval. A PMA application requires the payment of significant user fees and must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and efficacy of the device. A PMA application must also include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and proposed labeling. After a PMA application is submitted and found to be sufficiently complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facilities to ensure compliance with the FDA QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. FDA review of a PMA application is required by statute to take no longer than 180 days, although the process typically takes significantly longer, and may require several years to complete. The FDA can delay, limit, or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including the systems may not be safe or effective to the FDA satisfaction; the data from preclinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; the manufacturing process or facilities used may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. If the FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA. When and if those conditions have been fulfilled to the satisfaction of the FDA, the agency will issue a PMA letter authorizing commercial marketing of the device for certain indications. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA application or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny PMA or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also determine that additional clinical trials are necessary, in which case the PMA may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and the data submitted in an amendment to the PMA application. Even if a PMA application is approved, the FDA may approve the device with an indication that is narrower or more limited than originally sought. The agency can also impose restrictions on the sale, distribution or use of the device as a condition of approval, or impose post approval requirements such as continuing evaluation and periodic reporting on the safety, efficacy, and reliability of the device for its intended use. New PMA applications or PMA supplements may be required for modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as an initial PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. 13 Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and are sometimes required for a 510(k) clearance. These trials generally require submission of an application for an Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) to the FDA. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Generally, clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the study protocol and informed consent are approved by appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. FDA approval of an IDE allows clinical testing to go forward but does not bind the FDA to accept the results of the trial as sufficient to prove the product safety and efficacy, even if the trial meets its intended success criteria. With certain exceptions, changes made to an investigational plan after an IDE is approved must be submitted in an IDE supplement and approved by FDA (and by governing institutional review boards when appropriate) prior to implementation. All clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with regulations and requirements collectively known as good clinical practice. Good clinical practices include the FDA IDE regulations, which describe the conduct of clinical trials with medical devices, including the recordkeeping, reporting and monitoring responsibilities of sponsors and investigators, and labeling of investigational devices. They also prohibit promotion, test marketing or commercialization of an investigational device and any representation that such a device is safe or effective for the purposes being investigated. Good clinical practices also include the FDA regulations for institutional review board approval and for protection of human subjects (such as informed consent), as well as disclosure of financial interests by clinical investigators. Required records and reports are subject to inspection by the FDA. The results of clinical testing may be unfavorable or, even if the intended safety and efficacy success criteria are achieved, may not be considered sufficient for the FDA to grant approval or clearance of a product. The commencement or completion of any clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application or clearance of a premarket notification for numerous reasons. Continuing Regulation. After a device is cleared or approved for use and placed in commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing upon the commencement of manufacturing; the QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during medical device design and manufacturing processes; labeling regulations, which prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses and impose other restrictions on labeling and promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if malfunctions were to recur; corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections; and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA caused by the device that may present a risk to health. In addition, the FDA may require a company to conduct post market surveillance studies or order it to establish and maintain a system for tracking its products through the chain of distribution to the patient level. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including those applicable to the conduct of clinical trials, can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may lead to any of the following sanctions warning letters or untitled letters; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of FDA approval; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; or criminal prosecution. 14 We and our contract manufacturers, specification developers and suppliers are also required to manufacture our products in compliance with current good manufacturing practice requirements set forth in the QSR. The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing and record keeping. The FDA enforces the QSR through periodic announced and unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of subcontractors. If the FDA believes that we or any of our contract manufacturers or regulated suppliers is not in compliance with these requirements, it can shut down our manufacturing operations, require recall of our products, refuse to clear or approve new marketing applications, institute legal proceedings to detain or seize products, enjoin future violations or assess civil and criminal penalties against us or our officers or other employees. Any such action by the FDA would have a material adverse effect on our business. Fraud and Abuse Our operations are directly, or indirectly through our customers, subject to various state and federal fraud and abuse laws, including, without limitation, the FDCA, the federal Anti Kickback Statute and the False Claims Act. These laws may impact, among other things, our sales, marketing, education and clinical programs. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, in exchange for or to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Several courts have interpreted the statute intent requirement to mean that if any 1 purpose of an arrangement involving remuneration is to induce referrals of federal healthcare covered business, the statute has been violated. The Anti Kickback Statute is broad and prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. Many states have also adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, some of which apply to the referral of patients for healthcare Item or services reimbursed by any source, not only the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The federal False Claims Act prohibits persons from knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false claim to, or the knowing use of false statements to obtain payment from, the federal government. Various states have also enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. In addition to the laws described above, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 created 2 new federal crimes healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. On June 28, 2016, we entered into a Settlement Agreement with the U.S. government, acting through the U.S. Attorney Office for the Western District of North Carolina (the DOJ ) and on behalf of the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services (the OIG ) and Travis Thams to resolve the DOJ investigation of whether we violated the False Claims Act. In connection with the resolution of this matter, we entered into a five year corporate integrity agreement (the Corporate Integrity Agreement ) with the OIG. The Corporate Integrity Agreement requires that we maintain our existing compliance programs and imposes certain expanded compliance related requirements during the term of the Corporate Integrity Agreement, including establishment of specific procedures and requirements regarding consulting activities, co marketing activities and other interactions with healthcare professionals and healthcare institutions and the sale and marketing of our products; ongoing monitoring, reporting, certification and training obligations; and the engagement of an independent review organization to perform certain auditing and reviews and prepare certain reports regarding our compliance with federal health care programs. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, or the Sunshine Act, and certain state laws require persons to collect and report certain data on payments and other transfers of value to physicians and teaching hospitals. It is widely anticipated that public reporting under the Sunshine Act and implementing Open Payment regulations will result in increased scrutiny of the financial relationships between industry, physicians and teaching hospitals. 15 Voluntary industry codes, federal guidance documents and a variety of state laws address the tracking and reporting of marketing practices relative to gifts given and other expenditures made to doctors and other healthcare professionals. In addition to impacting our marketing and educational programs, our internal business processes are and will continue to be affected by the numerous legal requirements and regulatory guidance at the state, federal and industry levels. International Regulation International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. While harmonization of global regulations has been pursued, requirements continue to differ significantly among countries. We expect this global regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact the cost, the time needed to approve, and, ultimately, our ability to maintain existing approvals or obtain future approvals for our products. Regulations of the FDA and, as we continue our international expansions, regulatory agencies outside the United States, may impose extensive compliance and monitoring obligations on us and our operations. Additionally, the time required to obtain approval in a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval and the requirements may differ. For example, the primary regulatory environment in Europe with respect to medical devices is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the European Union, although actual implementation of these directives may vary on a country by country basis. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of submission of a design dossier, self assessment by the manufacturer, a third party assessment, and review of the design dossier by a Notified Body. This third party assessment generally consists of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and manufacturing site, as well as review of the technical documentation used to support application of the CE Mark to 1 product and possibly specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. In July 2016, we submitted an application to Japan Pharmaceuticals and Medical Devices Agency ( PMDA ) for approval of our Coronary OAS Micro Crown and received approval in March 2017. In February 2018, Japan became the first international market for any of our products. As part of our Japan commercialization process we are subject to the requirements of the Japanese Act on Securing Quality, Efficacy and Safety of Pharmaceuticals, Medical Devices, Regenerative and Cellular Therapy Products, Gene Therapy Products, and Cosmetics (the PMD Act ). Our quality management system and products are subject to review and examination by PMDA and subject to approval and enforcement by Japan MHLW. The critical suppliers named in our application are also subject to this review and examination for the activities they perform for us. Non compliance with the PMD Act could result in revocation or suspension of our license, revocation of approvals, and criminal sanctions such as fines and or imprisonment. In July 2018, we entered into an exclusive distribution agreement with OrbusNeich to sell our Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS outside of the United States and Japan. In connection with the introduction of our products in each country under this distribution agreement, we will need to seek regulatory approvals of our products under the rules and regulations applicable in each such country and we will be required to comply with ongoing requirements, which may be varied and require us to expend substantial resources. In addition, our international expansion, operations, distribution and sales will require us to comply with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti bribery laws in other jurisdictions and with U.S. and foreign export control, trade embargo and custom laws. Environmental Regulation Our operations are subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. We are currently classified and licensed as a Very Small Quantity Hazardous Waste Generator within Ramsey County, Minnesota. There are no regulated wastes requiring licensing in our Texas facility. 16 Employees As of June 30, 2018 , we had 652 full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union or are parties to a collective bargaining agreement, and we believe that our employee relations are good. Executive Officers of the Registrant The names, ages and positions of our current executive officers are as follows Name Age Position Scott R. Ward 58 Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey S. Points 41 Chief Financial Officer Rhonda J. Robb 50 Chief Operating Officer Laura J. Gillund 57 Chief Talent Officer Alexander Rosenstein 46 General Counsel and Corporate Secretary Sandra M. Sedo 54 Chief Compliance Officer Scott R. Ward, Chairman President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Ward has been a member of our Board of Directors since November 2013 and has served as its Chairman since November 2014. Mr. Ward served as our Interim President and Chief Executive Officer beginning November 30, 2015, and on August 15, 2016, Mr. Ward was appointed as our President and Chief Executive Officer. Since 2013, Mr. Ward has been 1 of the Managing Directors at SightLine Partners. Following his appointment as our President and Chief Executive Officer, Mr. Ward continues to be a Managing Director of Sightline Opportunity Management Fund II, LLC and may provide limited advisory and consulting services to Sightline Partners in this capacity. From 1981 to 2010, Mr. Ward was employed by Medtronic, Inc. and held a number of senior leadership positions. Mr. Ward was Senior Vice President and President of Medtronic CardioVascular business from May 2007 to November 2010. Prior to that he was Senior Vice President and President of Medtronic Vascular business from May 2004 to May 2007, Senior Vice President and President of Medtronic Neurological and Diabetes business, from February 2002 to May 2004, and President of Medtronic Neurological business from January 2000 to January 2002 He was Vice President and General Manager of Medtronic Drug Delivery business from 1995 to 2000. Prior to that, Mr. Ward led Medtronic Neurological Ventures in the successful development of new therapies. Mr. Ward serves on the boards of several private companies. Until April 2016, Mr. Ward was the Chairman of the Board of Creganna Medical. Mr. Ward served as a member of the Board of Surmodics, Inc. from September 2010 to March 2015. Jeffrey S. Points, Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Points joined us in September 2007 as Corporate Controller, became Senior Director and Controller in July 2013, Corporate Controller and Treasurer in January 2015, Vice President, Corporate Controller and Treasurer in May 2017 and was promoted to Chief Financial Officer in February 2018. From July 2005 to September 2007, Mr. Points was Assistant Controller at Empi, a manufacturer and provider of non invasive medical products for pain management and physical rehabilitation. From January 1998 to July 2005, Mr. Points held various leadership positions at CliftonLarsonAllen, a national public accounting firm. Mr. Points also serves as a member of the Board of Directors for The Phoenix Residence, Inc. Rhonda J. Robb, Chief Operating Officer. Ms. Robb joined us as Chief Operating Officer in January 2018. Prior to joining us, she held several positions at Medtronic, most recently as Vice President and General Manager of the Heart Valve Therapies Business from 2014 to 2018. From 2009 to 2014, Ms. Robb was Vice President and General Manager for Medtronic Catheter Based Therapies business. Ms. Robb was employed by Medtronic since 1990 and has served in several other leadership roles, including Vice President of Global Marketing, Coronary and Peripheral; Director Global Marketing, Heart Failure High Power Therapies; and Director US Marketing, Cardiac Rhythm & Disease Management. Laura J. Gillund, Chief Talent Officer. Ms. Gillund joined us in September 2013 as Vice President of Human Resources and Professional Development and was promoted to Chief Talent Officer in April 2016. Previously, Ms. Gillund was Vice President of Human Resources for C.H. Robinson Worldwide, Inc. from August 2002 to May 2012 Ms. Gillund serves as a member of the Board of Allina Health System and as member of the Board of Directors of College Possible. Alexander Rosenstein, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary. Mr. Rosenstein joined us in September 2014 as Corporate Legal and Compliance Counsel, became Corporate Secretary in November 2014, and was promoted to General Counsel in 17 March 2015. From October 2005 to September 2014, Mr. Rosenstein was an attorney at Fredrikson & Byron, P.A., which provides legal services to us from time to time, and from September 1998 to September 2005, he was an attorney practicing in New York City. Sandra M. Sedo, Chief Compliance Officer. Ms. Sedo joined us in June 2016 as Corporate Compliance Officer and was promoted to Chief Compliance Officer in July 2017. Prior to joining us, Ms. Sedo consulted for medical device companies in the legal and compliance areas. From 2005 to 2015, Ms. Sedo was employed by Medtronic, Inc. in various legal and compliance roles, and prior to that was a partner at Dorsey & Whitney LLP, which provides legal services to us from time to time. Item 1A. Risk Factors . Risks Relating to Our Business and Operations We have a history of net losses and a short commercialization experience, and we may continue to incur losses. We were profitable in fiscal 2018 but have incurred net losses in each prior fiscal year since our formation in 1989. For the years ended June 30, 2018 , 2017 , and 2016 , we had net income (losses) of $ 17 million , $(18) million , and $(56.0) million , respectively. As of June 30, 2018 , we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $327.6 million . We commenced commercial sales of the Peripheral OAS in September 2007 and the Coronary OAS in October 2013, and our short commercialization experience makes it difficult for us to predict future performance. We expect to continue to incur significant expenses for sales and marketing, research and development, and manufacturing as we expand our product offering, launch our business in international markets and continue to commercialize the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS and develop and commercialize future versions of the Peripheral OAS, the Coronary OAS, and any future products. Additionally, we expect that our general and administrative expenses will increase to support business growth. If we are unable to balance revenue growth and cost management, our operating losses may continue. We may be unable to sustain our historical revenue growth. Other than a 4.9% decline in revenue from sales of our Peripheral OAS during fiscal 2016, our revenue from sales of our OAS devices has grown in each of the fiscal years since we began commercialization in September 2007. Our ability to increase our revenues in future periods will depend on our ability to increase sales of the OAS and other products we introduce, which will, in turn, depend in part on our success in growing our customer base and reorders from those customers. We may not be able to generate, sustain or increase revenues on a quarterly or annual basis. If we cannot achieve or sustain revenue growth for an extended period, our financial results will be adversely affected and our stock price may decline. The Peripheral OAS, the Coronary OAS and other products may never achieve broad market acceptance. The Peripheral OAS, Coronary OAS, and other products we develop or market now or in the future may never gain broad market acceptance among physicians, patients and the medical community. The degree of market acceptance of any of our products will depend on a number of factors, including the actual and perceived effectiveness and reliability of our products; the prevalence and severity of any adverse patient events involving our products; the results of any clinical trials relating to use of our products; the availability, relative cost and perceived advantages and disadvantages of alternative technologies or treatment methods for conditions treated by our products; the degree to which treatments using our products are approved for reimbursement by public and private insurers; the degree to which physicians adopt our products; the extent to which we are successful in educating physicians about PAD and CAD in general and the existence and benefits of our products in particular; the strength of our marketing and distribution infrastructure; the level of education and awareness among physicians and hospitals concerning our products; and our reputation among physicians and hospitals. Failure of our products to significantly penetrate current or new markets would negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. 18 Our customers may not be able to achieve adequate reimbursement for using the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS or other products, which could affect the acceptance of our products and cause our business to suffer. The availability of insurance coverage and reimbursement for newly approved medical devices and procedures is uncertain. The commercial success of our products is substantially dependent on whether third party insurance coverage and reimbursement for the use of such products and related services are available. We expect our products to continue to be purchased by hospitals and other providers who will then seek reimbursement from various public and private third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers, for the services provided to patients. While third party payors are currently providing reimbursement for our products, we can give no assurance that these third party payors will continue to provide adequate reimbursement for use of the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS and our other products to permit hospitals and doctors to consider the products cost effective for patients requiring treatment, or that current reimbursement levels for our products will continue. In addition, the overall amount of reimbursement available for PAD and CAD treatment could decrease in the future. Failure by hospitals and other users of our products to obtain sufficient reimbursement could cause our business to suffer. Medicare, Medicaid, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement, and, as a result, they may not cover or provide adequate payment for use of our products. In order to position our products for acceptance by third party payors, we may have to agree to lower prices than we might otherwise charge. Governmental and private sector payors have instituted initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs using, for example, price regulation or controls and competitive pricing programs. Some third party payors also require demonstrated superiority, on the basis of randomized clinical trials, or pre approval of coverage, for new or innovative devices or procedures before they will reimburse healthcare providers who use such devices or procedures. It is uncertain whether our current products or any future products we may develop will be viewed as sufficiently cost effective to warrant adequate coverage and reimbursement levels. In addition, in June 2016, we entered into a Settlement Agreement with the U.S. government, acting through the U.S. Attorney for the Western District of North Carolina (the DOJ ) and on behalf of the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services (the OIG ), and Travis Thams, and a five year Corporate Integrity Agreement with the OIG. In the event of a breach of the Settlement Agreement or the Corporate Integrity Agreement, we could be excluded from participation in federal health care programs. If third party coverage and reimbursement for our products is limited or not available, the acceptance of our products and, consequently, our business will be substantially harmed. Healthcare reform legislation could adversely affect our operating results and financial condition. There have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators and third party payors to control healthcare costs and, more generally, to reform the U.S. healthcare system, some of which have been enacted into law, such as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, or the Patient Act. The Patient Act and any additional healthcare proposals and laws that may be enacted in the future could also limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The Patient Act and future healthcare legislation could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. The U.S. Congress has in the past considered legislation to repeal, modify or replace the Patient Act. We cannot predict the outcome of these efforts and, as a result, we cannot predict the effect that any such repeal, modification or replacement will have on our business and results of operations. Our financial performance may be adversely affected by medical device tax provisions in the health care reform legislation. The imposition of the 23% medical device excise tax enacted as part of the Patient Act has adversely affected our financial results and has required, and will continue to require, us to identify ways to reduce spending in other areas or raise additional capital to offset the increased expense. Although the excise tax has been suspended by Congress until the end of 2019, its status is unclear for subsequent years. We have not been able to pass along the cost of the tax to our customers or offset the cost of the tax through higher sales volumes resulting from the expansion of health insurance coverage and do not expect to be able to do so in the future. Ongoing implementation of this legislation could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows. 19 We have limited data and experience regarding the safety and efficacy of the Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS. Any long term data that is generated may not be positive or consistent with our limited short term data, which would affect market acceptance of these products. Because our technology is relatively new in the treatment of PAD and CAD, we have performed clinical trials only with limited patient populations. The long term effects of using the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS in a large number of patients have not been studied and the results of short term clinical use of the Peripheral OAS or the Coronary OAS do not necessarily predict long term clinical benefits or reveal long term adverse effects. We are conducting and developing several clinical trials, and there are substantial risks and uncertainties involved in these trials. We must devote substantial resources to our clinical trials, clinical trials often take several years to develop and conduct, there are difficulties involved in locating sites and patients to participate in our clinical trials, and the results of every trial are uncertain until the trial is completed. These uncertainties could adversely impact our financial results, our reputation and the reputation of our products. Clinical trials conducted with the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS have involved procedures performed by physicians who are very technically proficient. Consequently, both short and long term results reported in these studies may be significantly more favorable than typical results achieved by physicians, which could negatively impact market acceptance of the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS and materially harm our business. We face significant competition, must innovate to stay competitive, and may be unable to sell the Peripheral OAS, the Coronary OAS or any other products at profitable levels. The market for medical devices is highly competitive, dynamic and marked by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to innovate successfully, and, while certain barriers exist to entry into our market, we cannot assure that new entrants or existing competitors will not be able to develop products that compete directly with our products. We compete against very large and well known stent and balloon angioplasty device manufacturers, atherectomy catheter manufacturers, pharmaceutical companies, and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral and coronary bypass procedures. We may have difficulty competing effectively with these competitors because of their well established positions in the marketplace, significant financial and human capital resources, established reputations and worldwide distribution channels. Our competitors may develop and patent processes or products earlier than we will; obtain regulatory clearances or approvals for competing medical device products more rapidly than we will; market their products more effectively than we will; sell their products at lower prices than we do; or develop more effective or less expensive products or technologies that render our technology or products obsolete or non competitive. We have encountered and expect to continue to encounter potential customers who, due to existing relationships with our competitors, are committed to or prefer the products offered by these competitors. In addition, increased consolidation in the healthcare industry has resulted in companies with greater market power, which increases competition for goods and services. We experience significant competition on the pricing of our products and expect to continue to experience pressure from our customers to lower our prices. Our customers may require lower pricing in connection with contract renewals or otherwise for us to continue to sell our products to them. In addition, if our Purchasing Agreement with HealthTrust Purchasing Group, L.P. is terminated, our financial results will be materially adversely affected. If we are unable to compete successfully, our revenue will suffer. Increased competition might lead to price reductions and other concessions that might adversely affect our operating results. Competitive pressures may decrease the demand for our products and could adversely affect our financial results. Our efforts to develop new products may not be successful or the new products may not provide the revenue we expect. We plan to add to our product portfolio through both internal development efforts and through acquisitions, distribution agreements, licensing transactions, manufacturing agreements and other strategic partnerships. For example, we recently entered into an agreement with Aerolase Corp. for the co development of a new vascular laser device for physicians to use in more effectively treating multiple forms of arterial disease and we are developing a new temporary hemodynamic support 20 pump. These new products and technologies may fail to reach the market or may only have limited commercial success because of efficacy or safety concerns, failure to achieve positive clinical outcomes, inability to obtain necessary regulatory approvals, limited scope of approved uses, excessive costs to manufacture, failure to establish or maintain intellectual property rights, or infringement of the intellectual property rights of others. Even if we successfully develop new products or enhancements or new generations of our existing products, they may be quickly rendered obsolete by changing customer preferences, changing industry standards, or competitors innovations. Innovations may not be accepted quickly in the marketplace because of, among other things, entrenched patterns of clinical practice or uncertainty over third party reimbursement. We cannot provide certainty as to when or whether any of our products under development will be launched, whether we will be able to develop, license, or otherwise acquire compounds or products, or whether any products will be commercially successful. Failure to launch successful new products or technologies, or new indications or uses for existing products, may cause our products or technologies to become obsolete, causing our revenues and operating results to suffer. We have limited commercial manufacturing experience and could experience difficulty in producing the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS or may need to depend on third parties to manufacture the products. We have limited experience in commercially manufacturing the Peripheral OAS, even less experience in commercially manufacturing the Coronary OAS and no experience manufacturing these products in the quantities that we anticipate will be required if we achieve planned levels of commercial sales. As a result, we may not be able to develop and implement efficient, low cost manufacturing capabilities and processes that will enable us to manufacture the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS or future products in significant volumes, while meeting the legal, regulatory, quality, price, durability, engineering, design and production standards required to market our products successfully. The forecasts of demand we use to determine order quantities and lead times for comp1nts purchased from outside suppliers may be incorrect. Our failure to obtain required comp1nts or subassemblies when needed and at a reasonable cost would adversely affect our business. In addition, we may in the future need to depend upon third parties to manufacture the Peripheral OAS and Coronary OAS and future products. Any difficulties in locating and hiring third party manufacturers, or in the ability of third party manufacturers to supply quantities of our products at the times and in the quantities we need, could have a material adverse effect on our business. We depend upon third party suppliers, including single source suppliers to us and our customers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on third party suppliers to provide us with certain comp1nts of our products and to provide key comp1nts or supplies to our customers for use with our products. We rely on single source suppliers for certain comp1nts of the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS, including the diamond grit coated crown and our ViperSlide Lubricant. In some cases, we do not have long term supply agreements with, or guaranteed commitments from, our suppliers, including single source suppliers. We depend on our suppliers to provide us and our customers with materials in a timely manner that meet our and their quality, quantity and cost requirements. These suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand and our customers demands. These suppliers may cease producing the comp1nts we purchase from them or otherwise decide to cease doing business with us. Any supply interruption from our suppliers or failure to obtain additional suppliers for any of the comp1nts used in our products would limit our ability to manufacture our products and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are dependent on our senior management team and highly skilled personnel, and our business could be harmed if we are unable to attract and retain personnel necessary for our success. We are highly dependent on our senior management and other key personnel. Our success will depend on our ability to retain senior management and to attract and retain qualified personnel in the future, including sales and marketing professionals, scientists, clinical specialists, engineers and other highly skilled personnel and to integrate current and additional personnel in all departments. The loss of members of our senior management, sales and marketing professionals, scientists, clinical and regulatory specialists and engineers could prevent us from achieving our objectives of continuing to grow our company. We do not carry key person life insurance on any of our employees. 21 We have increased the size of our organization and may need to do so in the future, and we may experience difficulties managing growth. If we are unable to manage the anticipated growth of our business, our future revenue and operating results may be adversely affected. We have significantly expanded the size of our organization over the past 3 years, particularly in the number of sales and marketing personnel, and may need to do so in the future. The growth we may experience in the future may provide challenges to our organization, requiring us to also rapidly expand other aspects of our business, including our manufacturing operations. Rapid expansion in personnel may result in less experienced people producing and selling our products, which could result in unanticipated costs and disruptions to our operations. If we cannot scale and manage our business appropriately, our anticipated growth may be impaired and our financial results will suffer. We intend to sell our products internationally in the future, but we may experience difficulties in obtaining approval to do so or in successfully marketing our products internationally even if approved. Currently, substantially all of our revenues are in the United States, and in fiscal 2018, commercial sales of certain of our products commenced in Japan, which became the first international market for our products. We intend to further expand our international sales in the future, both in Japan with Medikit and in the rest of the world under our Distribution Agreement with OrbusNeich. There can be no guarantee that we will receive approval to sell our products in any additional countries or that any of our approvals will be maintained, nor can there be any guarantee that any sales would result even if such approval is received. We will be substantially reliant upon Medikit and OrbusNeich for our international sales, and any failure of such distributors to effectively sell our products could have a material adverse effect on our international efforts and harm our financial position. In addition, we will incur substantial expenses in connection with international expansion. Our inability to successfully enter international markets and manage business on a global scale could negatively affect our financial results. We may require additional financing, and our failure to obtain additional financing when needed could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our product development programs or commercialization efforts. We may be dependent on additional financing to execute our business plan. Additional funds may not be available when we need them on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. In the event we need or desire additional financing, we may be unable to obtain it by borrowing m1y in the credit markets or raising m1y in the capital markets. If adequate funds are not available on a timely basis, we may terminate or delay the development of 1 or more of our products, or delay establishment of sales and marketing capabilities or other activities necessary to commercialize our products. We face a risk of non compliance with the financial covenants in our loan and security agreement with Silicon Valley Bank. We are party to a loan and security agreement with Silicon Valley Bank. This agreement requires us to maintain, among other things, either (i) minimum unrestricted cash at Silicon Valley Bank and unused availability on our line of credit of at least $10.0 million or (ii) minimum trailing 3 month Adjusted EBITDA of $10 million and contains customary events of default, including, among others, the failure to comply with certain covenants or other agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an event of default, amounts due under the agreements may be accelerated by Silicon Valley Bank. If we are unable to meet the financial or other covenants under the current loan and security agreement or negotiate future waivers or amendments of such covenants, events of default could occur under the agreement. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an event of default under the agreement, Silicon Valley Bank has available a range of remedies customary in these circumstances, including declaring all outstanding debt, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to be due and payable, foreclosing on the assets securing the agreement and or ceasing to provide additional loans under our line of credit, which could have a material adverse effect on us. The restrictive covenants under this agreement could limit our ability to obtain future financing, withstand a future downturn in our business or the economy in general or otherwise conduct necessary corporate activities. The financial and restrictive covenants contained in this agreement could also adversely affect our ability to respond to changing economic and business conditions and place us at a competitive disadvantage relative to other companies that may be subject to fewer restrictions. Transactions that we may view as important opportunities, such as acquisitions, may be subject to the consent of Silicon Valley Bank, which consent may be withheld or granted subject to conditions specified at the time that may affect the attractiveness or viability of the transaction. We lease our corporate headquarters, which subjects us to ongoing payment obligations and compliance with certain covenants. 22 On March 30, 2017, we completed the sale of our corporate headquarters. In connection with such sale, we entered into a lease agreement for our corporate headquarters, which has an initial term of fifteen years, with four consecutive renewal options of five years each. Under this lease, we are obligated to pay a base annual rent in the first year of $1,637,500 with annual escalations of 3%. If we are unable to make such rent payments or comply with the other covenants contained in the lease, the landlord could take certain actions against us, up to and including termination of the lease, which could have an adverse impact on our business, results of operations or financial conditions. Our stock price is volatile and subject to significant fluctuations. The market price of our common stock could be subject to significant fluctuations. Market prices for securities of early stage pharmaceutical, medical device, biotechnology and other life sciences companies have historically been particularly volatile. Our common stock traded as low as $20.58 and as high as $34.51 per share during the 12 month period ended June 30, 2018 . Factors that may cause the market price of our common stock to fluctuate include, but are not limited to announcements of technological or medical innovations for the treatment of vascular disease; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; failure to meet estimates or recommendations by securities analysts who cover our stock; failure to meet our own financial estimates; accusations that we have violated a law or regulation; recalls of our products; significant litigation; sales of large blocks of our common stock, including sales by our executive officers, directors and significant stockholders; changes in accounting principles; actual or anticipated changes in healthcare policy and reimbursement levels; developments relating to our competitors and markets; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. Moreover, the stock markets in general have experienced substantial volatility that has often been unrelated to the operating performance of individual companies. These broad market fluctuations may also adversely affect the trading price of our common stock. Our ability to use our net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes may be limited. Under Sections 382 and 383 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if a corporation undergoes an ownership change, the corporation ability to use its pre change net operating loss carryforwards and other pre change tax attributes, such as research tax credits, to offset its post change income or taxes may be limited. In general, an ownership change will occur if there is a cumulative change in our ownership by 5 percent shareholders that exceeds 50 percentage points over a rolling 3 year period. Similar rules may apply under state tax laws. We may have experienced an ownership change in the past and we may also experience ownership changes in the future as a result of future transactions in our stock, some of which may be outside our control. As a result, if we earn net taxable income, our ability to use our pre change net operating loss carryforwards or other pre change tax attributes to offset U.S. federal and state taxable income or taxes may be subject to limitations. An interruption in or breach of security of our information or manufacturing systems could cause a loss of business or damage to our reputation. We rely on information and communication systems in our manufacturing and in the conduct our business. If there is any failure or interruption of these systems, such an incident could cause failures or disruptions in our customer relationship systems or product manufacturing. In addition, we could be subject to a cyber incident, such as an intentional attack or an unintentional event that involves a third party gaining unauthorized access to our systems, which could disrupt our operations, corrupt our data, or result in release of our confidential information. The occurrence of any failures, interruptions or cyber incidents could cause a loss of business or damage to our reputation and have a material effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. 23 The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 may have a significant impact on our financial condition and results of operations. The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (the Tax Act ) was signed into law on December 22, 2017. The Tax Act made numerous changes to U.S. federal corporate tax law and is expected to reduce our effective tax rate for the year ended June 30, 2018 and future periods. Effective January 1, 2018, the Tax Act lowers the U.S. corporate tax rate from 35% to 21% and prompts various other changes to U.S. federal corporate tax law. We have assessed the impact the Tax Act with our professional advisors which resulted in the remeasurement of our deferred tax assets and valuation allowance. The impact the Tax Act will have on us in future periods is uncertain and may adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. The effects of hurricanes, flooding and other natural disasters may impact our sales, inventories and supply availability, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. In August and September 2017, Hurricanes Harvey and Irma made landfall along the Texas Gulf Coast and in the State of Florida, respectively, bringing high winds, unprecedented rain and extreme flooding to those areas. A significant portion of our sales is generated from these areas. Procedure volumes in the Houston area and in Florida decreased during the pendency and immediate aftermath of the hurricanes and flooding, which decreased the number of our products used during this time. Any sustained decrease in procedure volumes from hurricanes and other natural disasters that affect any areas in which our customers are located will result in decreased sales in these areas and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. In addition, we maintain a 46,000 square foot production facility in Pearland, Texas, which is just outside of Houston in southeast Texas. The storm and its aftermath did not cause damage to our Pearland facility. However, any future loss of operations at the Pearland facility as a result of natural disasters eliminates an alternate production source in the event that our manufacturing capacity at the Minnesota facility is disrupted for any reason. Any disruptions in our ability to timely manufacture and supply our products to our customers could cause us to experience delays in recognizing revenue or even to lose sales altogether, and any additional hurricanes, flooding or other natural disasters affecting areas in which our products are sold could result in decreased numbers of cases using our products. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. Risks Related to Government Regulation Our ability to market the Peripheral OAS in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with PAD and our ability to market the Coronary OAS in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with severely calcified CAD, and if we want to expand our marketing claims, we will need to file for additional FDA clearances or approvals and conduct further clinical trials, which would be expensive and time consuming and may not be successful. We received FDA 510(k) clearances in the United States for use of the Peripheral OAS as a therapy in patients with PAD, and we received PMA to use the Coronary OAS as a therapy in patients with severely calcified CAD. These general clearances and approvals restrict our ability to market or advertise the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS beyond these uses and could affect our growth. If we determine to market our orbital technology in the United States for other uses, we would need to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. Clinical trials are complex, expensive, time consuming, uncertain and subject to substantial and unanticipated delays. There is no assurance that we will be able to obtain FDA approval to use our orbital atherectomy technology for applications other than the treatment of PAD and CAD. We are or will be subject to an extensive set of post market controls that apply to us as we commercialize our products, including annual PMA reports, Medical Device Reports on serious adverse events, complaint handling and analysis under the FDA QSR, export controls, advertising and promotion requirements, and potential post market studies required by the FDA. We and our suppliers are also subject to regulation by various state authorities, which may inspect our or our suppliers facilities and manufacturing processes and enforce state regulations. Failure to comply with applicable state regulations may result in seizures, injunctions or other types of enforcement actions. Our promotion of the Peripheral OAS and the Coronary OAS is closely controlled by the FDA and enforcement activities could limit our ability to inform potential customers of the features of the products. 24 Our products may in the future be subject to product recalls that could harm our reputation and product liability claims that could exceed the limits of available insurance coverage. The FDA and similar governmental authorities in other countries have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material regulatory deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. For example, since commercialization of the Peripheral OAS, we have had instances of recalls, including, in the year ended June 30, 2017 minor recalls involving guidewires and the OAS saline infusion pump recall discussed below. Any recalls of our products or products that we distribute would divert managerial and financial resources, harm our reputation with customers and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. Also, if any of our products is defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, we may become subject to costly litigation by our customers or their patients. The use, misuse or off label use of our products may result in injuries that lead to product liability suits, which could be costly to our business. We cannot prevent a physician from using any of our products for off label applications. While we have product liability insurance coverage for our products and intend to maintain such insurance coverage in the future, there can be no assurance that we will be adequately protected from claims that are brought against us. The recall of our saline infusion pumps could adversely affect our business and financial results, harm our reputation and result in legal claims against us. In April 2017, we initiated a voluntary recall of 1 type of our saline infusion pumps. While we have made design changes to this pump and have launched a next generation pump to address the issues that led to the recall, it is possible that we did not adequately assess the cause and effect of these issues and we may not have adequately modified the pump design in order to prevent these issues from happening in the future. Any additional problems with our pumps could cause delays in the ability of our customers to perform procedures using our devices and prevent us from adding new customers who may not have access to other pumps that can be used in procedures, which could harm our reputation with customers, adversely affect our ability to generate revenue, and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. Any future pump recall would harm our reputation and divert managerial and sales force attention and financial resources from other aspects of our business and would require us to incur substantial expense. We are subject to many laws and governmental regulations and any adverse regulatory action may materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. Our products and related manufacturing processes, clinical data, adverse events, recalls and corrections and promotional activities are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. In particular, we are required to comply with the QSR and other regulations, which cover the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, storage and shipping of any product for which we obtain marketing clearance or approval. We are also responsible for the quality of comp1nts received by our suppliers. Failure to comply with the QSR requirements or other statutes and regulations administered by the FDA and other regulatory bodies, or failure to adequately respond to any observations, could result in, among other things warning or other letters from the FDA; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of approval or clearance by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our product sales to suffer. Our operations are also subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. Environmental laws and regulations could become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. 25 In addition, our relationships with physicians, hospitals and the marketers of our products are subject to scrutiny under various federal anti kickback, self referral, false claims and similar laws, often referred to collectively as healthcare fraud and abuse laws, as further described below. If our operations are found to be in violation of these laws, we, as well as our employees, may be subject to penalties, including m1tary fines, civil and criminal penalties, exclusion from federal and state healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid, Veterans Administration health programs, workers compensation programs and TRICARE (the healthcare system administered by or on behalf of the U.S. Department of Defense for uniformed services beneficiaries, including active duty and their dependents, retirees and their dependents), and forfeiture of amounts collected in violation of such prohibitions, which could materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. In addition, we have agreements with federal, state and local government agencies, such as the Veterans Administration, and third party healthcare providers that receive government funding to sell our products. We are subject to extensive regulatory compliance obligations in the award, performance and administration of our government contracts, including regulations relating to procurement integrity, pricing protection, export control, government security, employment practices, accuracy of records and the recording of costs. The other parties to these agreements have the right to audit us to determine whether we are in compliance with these agreements. Failure to comply with these regulations and requirements could result in reductions of the value of contracts, contract modifications or termination, repayment of amounts, the assessment of penalties and fines, and or suspension or debarment from government contracting or subcontracting in the future, any of which could negatively affect our financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to federal and state laws prohibiting kickbacks and false and fraudulent claims which, if violated, could subject us to substantial penalties. Additionally, any challenges to or investigations into our practices under these laws could cause adverse publicity and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business. The federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute, and similar state laws, prohibit payments that are intended to induce health care professionals or others either to refer patients or to purchase, lease, order or arrange for or recommend the purchase, lease or order of healthcare products or services. A number of states have enacted laws that require pharmaceutical and medical device companies to monitor and report payments, gifts and other remuneration made to physicians and other health care professionals and health care organizations. In addition, some state statutes, most notably laws in Massachusetts and Vermont, impose outright bans on certain gifts to physicians as well as requiring reporting of payments to physicians. Some of these laws, referred to as aggregate spend or gift laws, carry substantial fines if they are violated. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, or the Sunshine Act, requires us to collect and report certain data on payments and other transfers of value to physicians and teaching hospitals. It is widely anticipated that public reporting under the Sunshine Act and implementing Open Payments regulations will result in increased scrutiny of the financial relationships between industry, physicians and teaching hospitals. These anti kickback, public reporting and aggregate spend laws affect our sales, marketing, promotional and clinical activities by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements, including sales programs, we may have with hospitals, physicians or other potential purchasers or users of medical devices. They also impose additional administrative and compliance burdens on us. In particular, these laws influence, among other things, how we structure our sales offerings, including discount practices, customer support, education and training programs, physician consulting and other service arrangements, and clinical trials. If we were to offer or pay inappropriate inducements to purchase our products, we could be subject to a claim under the federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute or similar state laws. If we fail to comply with particular reporting requirements, we could be subject to penalties under applicable federal or state laws. Other federal and state laws generally prohibit individuals or entities from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, claims for payments to Medicare, Medicaid or other third party payors that are false or fraudulent, or for Item or services that were not provided as claimed. Although we do not submit claims directly to government healthcare programs or other payors, manufacturers can be held liable under these laws if they are deemed to cause the submission of false or fraudulent claims by providing inaccurate billing or coding information to customers, by providing improper financial inducements, or through certain other activities. 26 In providing billing and coding information to customers, we make every effort to ensure that the billing and coding information furnished is accurate and that treating physicians understand that they are responsible for all treatment decisions. Nevertheless, we cannot provide assurance that the government will regard any billing errors that may be made as inadvertent or that the government will not examine our role in providing information to our customers and physicians concerning the benefits of therapy with our devices. Likewise, our financial relationships with customers, physicians, or others in a position to influence the purchase or use of our products may be subject to government scrutiny or be alleged or found to violate applicable fraud and abuse laws. False claims laws prescribe civil, criminal and administrative penalties for noncompliance, which can be substantial. Moreover, an unsuccessful challenge or investigation into our practices could cause adverse publicity, and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business and results of operations. On May 8, 2014, we received a letter from the DOJ stating that it was investigating us to determine whether we had violated the False Claims Act, and on June 28, 2016, we entered into a Settlement Agreement with the United States of America, acting through the DOJ and on behalf of the OIG, and Travis Thams, who filed the qui tam complaint underlying the DOJ investigation (the Civil Action ), to resolve the investigation by the DOJ and the Civil Action. The existence of the investigation and subsequent settlement could negatively affect our reputation and harm our business and results of operations. In addition, the release we received from the government in the Settlement Agreement related to particular conduct alleged in the complaint underlying the investigation. If the government determines that other conduct alleged in the complaint for which the government did not grant us a release merits additional investigation or if the government pursues any action against us relating to this other alleged conduct, then we may need to expend additional amounts to defend ourselves, our management would undergo the distraction of additional investigation and potential litigation, our reputation could be harmed, and our business and results of operations could be materially adversely affected. Compliance with the terms and conditions of our Corporate Integrity Agreement requires significant resources and management time and, if we fail to comply, we could be subject to penalties or, under certain circumstances, excluded from government healthcare programs, which would materially adversely affect our business. On June 28, 2016, we entered into a five year Corporate Integrity Agreement with the OIG. The Corporate Integrity Agreement requires that we maintain our existing compliance programs and imposes certain expanded compliance related requirements during the term of the Corporate Integrity Agreement, including establishment of specific procedures and requirements regarding consulting activities, co marketing activities and other interactions with healthcare professionals and healthcare institutions and the sale and marketing of our products; ongoing monitoring, reporting, certification and training obligations; and the engagement of an independent review organization to perform certain auditing and reviews and prepare certain reports regarding our compliance with federal health care programs. Maintaining the broad array of processes, policies and procedures necessary to comply with the Corporate Integrity Agreement will require a significant portion of management attention and the application of significant resources. The costs associated with implementation of and compliance with the Corporate Integrity Agreement could be substantial and may be greater than we currently anticipate. In addition, while we have developed and instituted a corporate compliance program, we cannot guarantee that we, our employees, our consultants or our contractors are or will be in compliance with all potentially applicable U.S. federal and state regulations and or laws, all potentially applicable foreign regulations and or laws and or all requirements of the Corporate Integrity Agreement. In the event of a breach of the Corporate Integrity Agreement, we could become liable for payment of certain stipulated penalties or could be excluded from participation in federal health care programs. The costs associated with compliance with the Corporate Integrity Agreement, or any liability or consequences associated with its breach, could have an adverse effect on our business, revenues, earnings and cash flows. Regulations related to conflict minerals may force us to incur additional expenses, may result in damage to our business reputation and may adversely impact our ability to conduct our business. Pursuant to the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, the SEC promulgated final rules regarding disclosure of the use of certain minerals, known as conflict minerals, that are mined from the Democratic Republic of the Congo and adjoining countries, as well as procedures regarding a manufacturer efforts to prevent the sourcing of such minerals and metals produced from those minerals. These disclosure requirements require ongoing due diligence efforts and disclosure obligations. There are costs associated with complying with these disclosure requirements, including for diligence in regards to the sources of any conflict minerals used in our products, in addition to the cost of remediation and other changes to products, processes, or sources of supply as a consequence of such verification activities. In addition, our ongoing implementation of these rules could adversely affect the sourcing, supply, and pricing of materials used in our products. 27 Our anticipated international expansion will subject us to increased legal and regulatory requirements, which could have a material effect on our business. In February 2018, Medikit, our exclusive distributor in Japan, commenced sales of our Coronary OAS Micro Crown, and, in July 2018, we entered into an exclusive Distribution Agreement with OrbusNeich to sell our Peripheral and Coronary OAS outside of the United States and Japan. We expect sales by OrbusNeich to commence in Southeast Asia, Europe and the Middle East in the year ending June 30, 2019. Movement into international markets will subject us and our products to different and increased laws and regulations, including foreign medical device regulations; tax laws; increased financial accounting and reporting burdens and complexities; export laws; and the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti corruption laws. Although we have and will continue to implement policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these laws, there can be no assurance that all of our employees, contractors, distributors and agents, as well as those companies to which we will outsource certain aspects of our business operations, including those based in foreign countries where practices that violate such U.S. laws may be customary, will comply with our internal policies. Medikit and OrbusNeich may appoint sub distributors of our products and we will have limited ability to control the actions of these sub distributors, but we may be held responsible by governmental authorities for the actions of these sub distributors. We will incur additional compliance costs associated with global operations, and any alleged or actual violations of these laws and regulations could subject us to government scrutiny, severe criminal or civil fines, sanctions and other liabilities, and prohibitions on business conduct, and could negatively affect our business, reputation, operating results, and financial condition. New regulatory requirements will impose additional burdens on us, and our business could be adversely affected if we are unable to satisfy all applicable new requirements in a timely fashion. New regulations impacting our products are periodically adopted. These regulations may require us to change our existing product designs in order to continue marketing our products, which could result in increased expenditures and in risks that we may be unable to successfully change our designs to satisfy the new requirements. For example, IEC 60601 1 2 (4th Edition) was published in July 2014 and updates the performance requirements with respect to electromagnetic interference for medical devices. In the United States, the 4th Edition requirements go into effect on December 31, 2018 for new devices and devices that have underg1 substantial changes. We have taken steps to ensure that our products sold in the United States will be compliant with the 4th Edition requirements, but we could experience technical and regulatory delays. If our products do not meet the 4th Edition standards, we may be delayed in launching new products or selling existing products that require material changes, including, for example, as a result of a change of supplier or quality issues. Any delays in selling our products resulting from non compliance with 4th Edition and other new regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business. The impact of restrictive trade policies in the United States and the potential corresponding actions by other countries could adversely affect our financial performance. The U.S. federal government has recently implemented tariffs on certain products imported into the United States from China, and the Chinese government has responded with retaliatory tariffs on certain products, including medical devices, exported from the United States to China. We cannot predict whether the United States will implement additional trade restrictions with respect to China or other countries and how such countries would respond to such trade restrictions. If these tariffs continue or are expanded, they would make it more difficult to sell our products in China or other markets outside of the United States, if we seek to expand into the Chinese or other markets in the future, and they may increase the costs of procuring comp1nt parts for our products from China or other countries. Restrictive trade policies may also harm the United States and global economies generally, which would adversely affect our business in a variety of ways, including reducing the market for our products, causing a downturn in the trading price of our common stock, and restricting access to credit if we seek it for future growth. Risks Relating to Our Intellectual Property Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete. Our success and ability to compete depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely on a combination of patents, copyrights and trademarks, as well as trade secrets and nondisclosure agreements, to protect our intellectual property. Our issued patents and related intellectual property may not be adequate to protect us or permit us to gain or maintain a competitive advantage. Also, we cannot be assured that any of our pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents to us. Further, if any patents we obtain or license are deemed invalid and unenforceable, or have their scope narrowed, it could impact our ability to commercialize or license our technology and achieve competitive advantages. 28 Changes in either the patent laws or in interpretations of patent laws in the United States and other countries may diminish the value of our intellectual property. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, if at all. We may, in the future, need to assert claims of infringement against third parties to protect our intellectual property. The outcome of litigation to enforce our intellectual property rights in patents, copyrights, trade secrets or trademarks is highly unpredictable, could result in substantial costs and diversion of resources, and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, reputation and results of operations regardless of the final outcome of such litigation. Despite our efforts to safeguard our unpatented and unregistered intellectual property rights, we may not be successful in doing so or the steps taken by us in this regard may not be adequate to detect or deter misappropriation of our technology or to prevent an unauthorized third party from copying or otherwise obtaining and using our products, technology or other information that we regard as proprietary. In addition, we may not have sufficient resources to litigate, enforce or defend our intellectual property rights. Additionally, third parties may be able to design around our patents. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. In this regard, we seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by having a policy that our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. We cannot provide any assurance that employees and third parties will abide by the confidentiality or assignment terms of these agreements, or that we will be effective in securing necessary assignments from these third parties. Claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others could prohibit us from commercializing products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or require us to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. The medical technology industry is characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights. The likelihood that patent infringement or misappropriation claims may be brought against us increases as we achieve more visibility in the marketplace and introduce products to market. We are aware of numerous patents issued to third parties that relate to the manufacture and use of medical devices for the treatment of vascular disease. The owners of each of these patents could assert that the manufacture, use or sale of our products infringes 1 or more claims of their patents. There could also be existing patents of which we are unaware that 1 or more aspects of our technology may inadvertently infringe. In some cases, litigation may be threatened or brought by a patent holding company or other adverse patent owner who has no relevant product revenues and against whom our patents may provide little or no deterrence. Any infringement or misappropriation claim could cause us to incur significant costs, place significant strain on our financial resources, divert management attention from our business and harm our reputation. If the relevant patents were upheld in litigation as valid and enforceable and we were found to infringe, we could be prohibited from commercializing any infringing products unless we could obtain licenses to use the technology covered by the patent or are able to design around the patent. We may be unable to obtain a license on terms acceptable to us, if at all, and we may not be able to redesign any infringing products to avoid infringement. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
